Missouri, session 2026, SB1582.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 172, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 172.921, to read as
follows:
172.921. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "MURR", the University of Missouri research
reactor;
(2) "Radiotheranostics", a treatment approach using
radioisotopes for both diagnosis and therapy;
(3) "Rare pediatric disease", a life-threatening or
chronically debilitating disease that affects fewer than two
hundred thousand individuals under eighteen years of age in
the United States;
(4) "University", the University of Missouri system
and its constituent campuses.
2. The university shall establish a governance board
composed of:
(1) Representatives from the school of medicine, MURR,
Ellis Fischel Cancer Center, and NextGen Precision Health;

SB 1582 2
(2) One appointee from each chamber of the general
assembly, appointed by the speaker of the Missouri house of
representatives and the president pro tempore of the
Missouri senate;
(3) One patient or family advocate representative; and
(4) One member representing a collaborating nonprofit
or industry partner.
3. The governance board shall submit an annual public
report to the general assembly no later than December thirty-
first of each year detailing:
(1) Research projects related to radiotheranostics in
the treatment of rare pediatric disease initiated and
completed;
(2) Key outcomes achieved;
(3) Funds expended and leveraged; and
(4) Any legislative recommendations.
4. This section shall expire on June 30, 2030.
✓